src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-1A-meaellad_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - meällad: # Verb 'to paddle/meloa' - full paradigm
     meällad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: meälam
     meällad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: meälak
     meällad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meäll
     meällad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: meällap
     meällad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: meällveʹted
     meällad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: meälˈla
     meällad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: meälat
     meällad+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: meäl
     meällad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: miâlˈlum
     meällad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: miâlˈluk
     meällad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: meälai
     meällad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [meälaim, meälain]
     meällad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: meälaid
     meällad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: miâlˈlu
     meällad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: miâlˈluš
     meällad+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: meällam
     meällad+V+Pot+Sg1: meälžem
     meällad+V+Pot+Sg2: meälžiǩ
     meällad+V+Pot+Sg3: meälaž
     meällad+V+Pot+Pl1: [meälžep, meälžim, meälžin]
     meällad+V+Pot+Pl2: meälžid 
     meällad+V+Pot+Pl3: meälže
     meällad+V+Pot+Sg4: meälžet
     meällad+V+Pot+ConNeg: meälže
     meällad+V+Cond+Sg1: meälčem
     meällad+V+Cond+Sg2: [meälčiǩ, meälčeǩ]
     meällad+V+Cond+Sg3: meälči
     meällad+V+Cond+Pl1: [meälčim, meälčin, meälčep]
     meällad+V+Cond+Pl2: meälčid
     meällad+V+Cond+Pl3: meälče
     meällad+V+Cond+Sg4: meälčeš
     meällad+V+Cond+ConNeg: meälče
     meällad+V+Imprt+Sg2: meäl
     meällad+V+Imprt+Sg3: meälas
     meällad+V+Imprt+Pl1: meällap
     meällad+V+Imprt+Pl2: meällad
     meällad+V+Imprt+Pl3: meälˈlaz
     meällad+V+Imprt+ConNeg: meäl
     meällad+V+Imprt+ConNegII: miâlˈlu
     meällad+V+Actio+Ess: meällmen
     meällad+V+Actio: meällam
     meällad+V+Act+PrsPrc: meällai
     meällad+V+Act+PrfPrc: meällam
     meällad+V+Pass+PrfPrc: miâlˈlum
     meällad+V+VAbess: [meälkani, meälǩânai, meälǩenai, meälǩâni, meälǩeânai, meälǩeânnai, meälkâni, meälǩani]
     meällad+V+Ger+Ess: meäleeʹn
     meällad+V+Ger+Instr: meäleeʹl
